Illinois, session 104th, HB4748.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Section 3.6 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/3.6)7    Sec. 3.6. Acceptance of stray dogs and cats.8    (a) No animal shelter may accept a stray dog or cat unless 9the animal is reported by the shelter to the animal control or 10law enforcement of the county in which the animal is found by 11the next business day. An animal shelter may accept animals 12from: (1) the owner of the animal where the owner signs a 13relinquishment form which states he or she is the owner of the 14animal; (2) an animal shelter licensed under this Act; or (3) 15an out-of-state animal control facility, rescue group, or 16animal shelter that is duly licensed in their state or is a 17not-for-profit organization.18    (b) When stray dogs and cats are accepted by an animal 19shelter, they must be scanned for the presence of a microchip 20and examined for other currently-acceptable methods of 21identification, including, but not limited to, identification 22tags, tattoos, and rabies license tags. The examination for 23identification shall be done within 24 hours after the intake   HB4748- 2 -LRB104 19071 AAS 32516 b1of each dog or cat. The animal shelter shall notify the owner 2and transfer any dog with an identified owner to the animal 3control or law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which 4it was found or the local animal control agency for 5redemption.6    (c) If no transfer can occur, the animal shelter shall 7make every reasonable attempt to contact the owner, agent, or 8caretaker as soon as possible. The animal shelter shall give 9notice of not less than 7 business days to the owner, agent, or 10caretaker prior to disposal of the animal. The notice shall be 11mailed to the last known address of the owner, agent, or 12caretaker. Testimony of the animal shelter, or its authorized 13agent, who mails the notice shall be evidence of the receipt of 14the notice by the owner, agent, or caretaker of the animal. A 15mailed notice shall remain the primary means of owner, agent, 16or caretaker contact; however, the animal shelter shall also 17attempt to contact the owner, agent, or caretaker by any other 18contact information, such as by telephone or email address, 19provided by the microchip or other method of identification 20found on the dog or cat. If the dog or cat has been 21microchipped and the primary contact listed by the chip 22manufacturer cannot be located or refuses to reclaim the dog 23or cat, an attempt shall be made to contact any secondary 24contacts listed by the chip manufacturer or the purchaser of 25the microchip if the purchaser is a nonprofit organization, 26animal shelter, animal control facility, pet store, breeder,   HB4748- 3 -LRB104 19071 AAS 32516 b1or veterinary office prior to adoption, transfer, or 2euthanization. Prior to transferring any stray dog or cat to 3another humane shelter, pet store, rescue group, or 4euthanization, the dog or cat shall be scanned again for the 5presence of a microchip and examined for other means of 6identification. If a second scan provides the same identifying 7information as the initial intake scan and the owner, agent, 8or caretaker has not been located or refuses to reclaim the dog 9or cat, the animal shelter may proceed with adoption, 10transfer, or euthanization.11    (d) When stray dogs and cats are accepted by an animal 12shelter and no owner can be identified, the shelter shall hold 13the animal for the period specified in local ordinance prior 14to adoption, transfer, or euthanasia. The animal shelter shall 15allow access to the public to view the animals housed there, 16and access to in-person viewing of the animals at the animal 17shelter shall not be restricted, except during emergency 18circumstances. If a dog is identified by an owner who desires 19to make redemption of it, the dog shall be transferred to the 20local animal control for redemption. If no transfer can occur, 21the animal shelter shall proceed pursuant to Section 3.7. Upon 22lapse of the hold period specified in local ordinance and no 23owner can be identified, ownership of the animal, by operation 24of law, transfers to the shelter that has custody of the 25animal.26    For purposes of this subsection (d), "access to the   HB4748- 4 -LRB104 19071 AAS 32516 b1public" means in-person access for any member of the public to 2view any impounded animal that is housed at an animal shelter 3during the animal shelter's regular hours of operation. 4    (e) No representative of an animal shelter may enter 5private property and remove an animal without permission from 6the property owner and animal owner, nor can any 7representative of an animal shelter direct another individual 8to enter private property and remove an animal unless that 9individual is an approved humane investigator (approved by the 10Department) operating pursuant to the provisions of the Humane 11Care for Animals Act.12    (f) Nothing in this Section limits an animal shelter and 13an animal control facility who, through mutual agreement, wish 14to enter into an agreement for animal control, boarding, 15holding, measures to improve life-saving, or other services 16provided that the agreement requires parties adhere to the 17provisions of the Animal Control Act, the Humane Euthanasia in 18Animal Shelters Act, and the Humane Care for Animals Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-310, eff. 1-1-16; 100-322, eff. 8-24-17; 20100-870, eff. 1-1-19.)